tr: Araç plaka yüzey kaplaması: Fırçalanmış; Krom kaplama; Parlak; Mat; Cilalı; Saten/Yarı parlak; Diğer
fi: Ajoneuvon rekisteröintikilven pintakäsittely: Harjattu; Kromiviimeistely; Kiiltävä; Matta; Kiillotettu; Satiini / puolikiiltävä; Muu
sl-SI: Končna obdelava registrske tablice vozila: Brušeno; Kromiran premaz; Sijaj; Mat; Polirano; Saten/polsijaj; Drugo
pt-BR: Placa veicular acabamento: Escovado; Acabamento cromado; Brilhante; Fosco; Polido; Acetinado/Semibrilhante; Outro
vi: Xe tem nhãn định danh kết thúc: Xước; Mạ crom; Bóng; Mờ; Đánh bóng; Satin/Bán bóng; Khác
ro-RO: Finisajul plăcuței de înmatriculare auto: Periat; Finisaj cromat; Lucios; Mat; Lustruit; Satinat / semilucios; Altele
zh-TW: 車牌表面處理: 髮絲紋; 鍍鉻表面; 亮面; 霧面; 拋光; 緞面/半亮面; 其他
es: Acabado de la placa de identificación del vehículo: Cepillado; Acabado cromado; Brillante; Mate; Pulido; Satinado/semibrillante; Otro
it: Finitura della targa del veicolo: Spazzolato; Finitura cromata; Lucido; Opaco; Lucidato; Satinato/semilucido; Altro
ru: Отделка поверхности номерного знака: Шлифованный; Хромированная отделка; Глянцевый; Матовый; Полированный; Сатиновый/полуглянцевый; Другое
sv: Ytbehandling av fordonets registreringsskylt: Borstad; Kromfinish; Glansig; Matt; Polerad; Satin/halvblank; Övrigt
pl: Wykończenie tablicy rejestracyjnej pojazdu: Szczotkowane; Wykończenie chromowane; Błyszczące; Matowe; Polerowane; Satynowe/półmatowe; Inne
nl: Voertuigkenteken afwerking: Geborsteld; Chroomafwerking; Glanzend; Mat; Gepolijst; Satijn/halfglanzend; Overig
da: Finish på nummerplade til køretøj: Børstet; Kromfinish; Blank; Mat; Poleret; Satin/halvblank; Andet
de: Finish des Fahrzeugkennzeichens: Gebürstet; Chrom-Finish; Glänzend; Matt; Poliert; Seidenmatt/Halbglänzend; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės valstybinio numeris apdaila: Šlifuotas; Chromuotas; Blizgus; Matinis; Poliruotas; Satininis / pusiau blizgus; Kita
nb: Finish for kjøretøys nummerskilt: Børstet; Kromfinish; Glanset; Matt; Polert; Satin/halvblank; Annet
el: Φινίρισμα πινακίδας κυκλοφορίας οχήματος: Βουρτσισμένο; Φινίρισμα χρωμίου; Γυαλιστερό; Ματ; Γυαλισμένο; Σατινέ/Ημι-γυαλιστερό; Άλλο
ja: 車両用ライセンスプレート仕上げ: つや消し; クローム仕上げ; 光沢; マット; ポリッシュ仕上げ; サテン/半光沢; その他
zh-CN: 车牌表面处理: 拉丝; 镀铬; 高光; 哑光; 抛光; 缎面/半光泽; 其他
bg-BG: Покритие на регистрационната табела на превозно средство: Матирана; Хромирано покритие; Гланцова; Матова; Полирана; Сатен/полугланц; Друго
th: การตกแต่งป้ายทะเบียนรถ: ขัดลายเส้น; ชุบโครเมียม; เคลือบเงา; เคลือบด้าน; ขัดเงา; ผิวซาติน/กึ่งเงา; อื่นๆ
cs: Povrchová úprava registrační značky vozidla: Kartáčovaný; Chromový povrch; Lesklý; Matný; Leštěný; Saténový/pololesklý; Jiné
en: Vehicle license plate finish: Brushed; Chrome finish; Glossy; Matte; Polished; Satin/Semi-gloss; Other
fr: Finition de la plaque d’immatriculation: Brossée; Finition chromée; Brillante; Mate; Polie; Satinée/semi-brillante; Autre
sk-SK: Povrchová úprava evidenčných čísiel vozidiel: Brúsený; Chrómový povrch; Lesklý; Matný; Leštený; Saténový/pololesklý; Iné
hu: Jármű rendszámtábla felületkezelése: Szálcsiszolt; Krómozott; Fényes; Matt; Polírozott; Szatén / Selyemfényű; Egyéb
hr-HR: Završna obrada registarske pločice vozila: Brušeno; Kromirani premaz; Sjajno; Matirano; Polirano; Satenski / Polusjajni; Ostalo
ko: 차량 번호판 마감: 브러시드; 크롬 마감; 유광; 무광; 유광 폴리싱; 반광/세미 글로스; 기타
pt-PT: Acabamento da matrícula do veículo: Escovado; Acabamento cromado; Brilhante; Mate; Polido; Acetinado/semibrilhante; Outro